src-fst-morphology-affixes-verb_suffixes.lexc.md
Verb suffixation

[OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]

[OLD: ENCLITICS]

END OF VERBINESS

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bla/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc)</small>
